Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1660
Approval to operate; Chief Water Officer; powers; hearing; notice.

(1) Each approval to operate issued by the Chief Water Officer under the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act shall contain such terms and conditions as the Chief Water Officer may prescribe.

(2) The Chief Water Officer shall revoke, suspend, or amend any approval to operate whenever it determines that the dam constitutes a danger to life and property.

(3) Before any approval to operate is revoked by the Chief Water Officer, the Chief Water Officer shall hold a public hearing. Written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be mailed to the owner at least thirty days before the date set for the hearing. Any interested persons may appear at the hearing and present their views and objections to the proposed action.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 60;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 298.